Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-114
LATA, defined.

LATA means local access and transport area as defined by 47 U.S.C. 153(25), as such section existed on January 1, 2002.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 15.